Washington statutes.
RCW 9.35.060

Consumer fraud targeting seniors, vulnerable individuals.

(1) It is the intent of this section to increase civil penalties for consumer fraud targeting a senior or a vulnerable individual.

(2) Any consumer fraud that targets a senior or a vulnerable individual, as defined in RCW 9.35.005, is subject to civil penalties of three times the amount of actual damages.

(3) This section creates no new cause of action. This section increases penalties where a plaintiff proceeds under any existing cause of action under statute or common law and successfully proves that he or she was victim to consumer fraud that targeted him or her as a senior or vulnerable individual.

[ 2017 c 4 s 6 (Initiative Measure No. 1501, approved November 8, 2016).]

NOTES:

Short title—Intent—Construction—2017 c 4 (Initiative Measure No. 1501): See notes following RCW 9.35.005.